Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska84-1513
Board; members; personal liability.

No member of the Public Employees Retirement Board shall be personally liable, except in cases of willful dishonesty, gross negligence, or intentional violations of law, for actions relating to administrative decisions pertaining to the retirement funds of retirement plans administered by the board.

Laws 1986, LB 311, § 42;

Laws 1998, LB 1191, § 81.